Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-130
Neglect of duty; penalty.

Any officer mentioned in sections 31-101 to 31-138 who shall neglect or refuse to perform any duty imposed upon him by the provisions of said sections, shall forfeit and pay a fine of twenty-five dollars for every such offense.

Laws 1881, c. 51, § 23, p. 245;

Laws 1911, c. 140, § 23, p. 462;

R.S.1913, § 1747;

C.S.1922, § 1694;

C.S.1929, § 31-130;

R.S.1943, § 31-130.